Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.178

Allotment of appropriations for school plant facilities—Modifiable basic or standard plans for school buildings.

When economies may be affected without impairing the usefulness and adequacy of school buildings, the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, may prescribe rules and establish procedures governing the preparation and use of modifiable basic or standard plans for school building construction projects for which state assistance funds provided by RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 are allotted.

[ 2006 c 263 s 317; 1990 c 33 s 462; 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.47.809, 28.47.809.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 244: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.